Utah statutes.
53A-3-402.9.   Assessment of emerging and early reading skills -- Resources
provided by school districts.
(1)  The Legislature recognizes that well-developed reading skills help:
(a)  children to succeed in school, develop self esteem, and build positive
relationships with others;
(b)  young adults to become independent learners; and
(c)  adults to become and remain productive members of a rapidly changing
technology-based society.
(2) (a)  Each potential kindergarten student, the student's parent or
guardian, and kindergarten personnel at the student's school may participate
in an assessment of the student's reading and numeric skills.
(b)  The State Office of Education, in cooperation with the state's school
districts, may develop the assessment instrument and any additional materials
needed to implement and supplement the assessment program.
(3)  The potential kindergarten student's teacher may use the assessment in
planning and developing an instructional program to meet the student's
identified needs.
(4) (a)  Each school is encouraged to schedule the assessment early enough
before the kindergarten starting date so that a potential kindergarten
student's parent or guardian has time to develop the child's needed skills as
identified by the assessment.
(b)  Based on the assessment under Subsection (2), the school shall provide
the potential student's parent or guardian with appropriate resource materials
to assist the parent or guardian at home in the student's literacy
development.
